Utah statutes.
58-70a-501.   Scope of practice.
(1)  A physician assistant may provide any medical services that are not
specifically prohibited under this chapter or rules adopted under this
chapter, and that are:
(a)  within the physician assistant's skills and scope of competence;
(b)  within the usual scope of practice of the physician assistant's
supervising physician; and
(c)  provided under the supervision of a supervising physician and in
accordance with a delegation of services agreement.
(2)  A physician assistant, in accordance with a delegation of services
agreement, may prescribe or administer an appropriate controlled substance if:
(a)  the physician assistant holds a Utah controlled substance license and a
DEA registration;
(b)  the prescription or administration of the controlled substance is within
the prescriptive practice of the supervising physician and also within the
delegated prescribing stated in the delegation of services agreement; and
(c)  the supervising physician cosigns any medical chart record of a
prescription of a Schedule 2 or Schedule 3 controlled substance made by the
physician assistant.
(3)  A physician assistant shall, while practicing as a physician assistant,
wear an identification badge showing his license classification as a
practicing physician assistant.
(4)  A physician assistant may not:
(a)  independently charge or bill a patient, or others on behalf of the
patient, for services rendered;
(b)  identify himself to any person in connection with activities allowed
under this chapter other than as a physician assistant; or
(c)  use the title "doctor" or "physician," or by any knowing act or omission
lead or permit anyone to believe he is a physician.
